Washington statutes.
RCW 32.20.460

Low-cost housing—Factory built housing—Mobile homes.

In addition to the portions of its funds permitted to be invested in real estate loans under RCW 32.20.410, a mutual savings bank may invest not to exceed fifteen percent of its funds in loans and investments as follows:

(1) Loans for the rehabilitation, remodeling, or expansion of existing housing.

(2) Loans in connection with, or participation in:

(a) Housing programs of any agency of federal, state, or local government; and

(b) Housing programs of any nonprofit, union, community, public, or quasi-public corporation or entity.

Such housing must be made available to all without regard to race, creed, sex, color, or national origin.

(3) Loans for purchasing or constructing factory built housing, including but not limited to mobile homes. The bank shall determine the amount, security, and repayment basis which it considers prudent for the loans.

(4) In mobile home chattel paper which finances the acquisition of inventory by a mobile home dealer if the inventory is to be held for sale in the ordinary course of business by the mobile home dealer, the monetary obligation evidenced by such chattel paper is the obligation of the mobile home dealer and the amount thereof does not exceed the amount allowed to be loaned on such mobile homes under subsection (3) of this section.

[ 1981 c 86 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 104 s 9; 1973 1st ex.s. c 31 s 2.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 86: See note following RCW 32.08.140.

Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 31: See RCW 32.20.500.